Hawaii statutes.
§501-215 Subrogation in favor of State.
In every case where payment has been made by the director of finance under
warrant from the governor, the State shall be subrogated to all rights of the
plaintiff against any other parties or securities, and the director shall
enforce the same in behalf of the State. Any sums so recovered by the director
shall be paid into the treasury of the State to the account of the general
fund. [L 1903, c 56, §100; RL 1925, §3290; am L 1932 2d, c 33, §4; RL 1935,
§5102; RL 1945, §12702; RL 1955, §342-102; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L
1963, c 114, §1; HRS §501-215]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next